California, session 20252026, SB889.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 10001 of the Welfare and Institutions Code is amended to read:10001. The purposes of the public social services for which state grants-in-aid are made to counties are: are as follows:(a) To provide on behalf of the general public, and within the limits of public resources, reasonable support and maintenance for needy and dependent families and persons.(b) To provide timely and appropriate services to assist individuals to develop or use whatever capacity they can maintain or achieve for self-care or self-support.(c) To provide protective services to handicapped or deprived persons individuals subject to social or legal disability, disability and to children and others subject to exploitation jeopardizing that jeopardizes their present or future health, opportunity for normal development, or capacity for independence.